Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8204
Advanced level rehabilitation center, defined.

Advanced level rehabilitation center means a rehabilitation center which, in addition to the services provided at intermediate level and general level rehabilitation centers, provides services to patients with traumatic brain or spinal injuries, complicated amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in functional impairment in more than one functional area, with moderate to severe impairment or complexity, and serves as a referral facility for intermediate level and general level rehabilitative services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 3.